Illinois, session 104th, HB1817.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Illinois Police Training Act is amended by 5changing Section 10.6 as follows: 6    (50 ILCS 705/10.6)7    Sec. 10.6. Mandatory training to be completed every 2 3 8years. 9    (a) The Board shall adopt rules and minimum standards for 10mandatory in-service training requirements as set forth in 11this Section, which must be completed every 2 years. The 12training shall provide officers with knowledge of policies and 13laws regulating the use of force; equip officers with tactics 14and skills, including de-escalation techniques, to prevent or 15reduce the need to use force or, when force must be used, to 16use force that is objectively reasonable, necessary, and 17proportional under the totality of the circumstances; and 18ensure appropriate supervision and accountability. The 19training shall include at least 30 hours of training, 20including:21        (1) At least 12 hours of hands-on, scenario-based 22    role-playing.23        (2) At least 6 hours of instruction on use of force   HB1817- 2 -LRB104 08530 RTM 18582 b1    techniques, including the use of de-escalation techniques 2    to prevent or reduce the need for force whenever safe and 3    feasible.4        (3) Specific training on the law concerning stops, 5    searches, and the use of force under the Fourth Amendment 6    to the United States Constitution.7        (4) Specific training on officer safety techniques, 8    including cover, concealment, and time.9        (5) At least 6 hours of training focused on high-risk 10    traffic stops.11    (b) Notwithstanding any provision of law to the contrary, 12the changes made to this Section by Public Act 101-652, Public 13Act 102-28, and Public Act 102-694 take effect July 1, 2022. 14(Source: P.A. 102-28, eff. 6-25-21; 102-694, eff. 1-7-22; 15103-154, eff. 6-30-23.)